Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5529.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly makes the following findings of fact:
(1) The Medicare Savings Programs ("MSP") pay the monthly Medicare premium
($185/month in 2025) for eligible seniors and people with disabilities, increasing economic security
for those enrolled.
(2) The Medicare Savings Programs also pay Medicare cost-sharing (deductibles,
coinsurance and co-payments) for the lowest-income enrollees, increasing access to care.
(3) The federal government sets minimum income and resource eligibility for the Medicare
Savings Program.
(4) States are permitted to increase the income and resource standards but the percentage
increase in eligibility for higher-income MSP enrollees must not be higher than the percentage
increase for lower-income enrollees.
(5) The federal government pays the full cost for higher-income (MSP) enrollees and over
half the cost for lower-income MSP enrollees.
(6) Individuals enrolled in MSP are automatically enrolled in the federally funded Part D
Low-Income Subsidy (Extra Help) program which helps pay prescription drug costs with average
savings for enrollees of $5,300 per year.
SECTION 2. Title 40 of the General Laws entitled "HUMAN SERVICES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 8.16

MEDICARE SAVINGS PROGRAMS
40-8.16-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Medicare Savings Programs”.
40-8.16-2. Purpose.
The Medicare savings programs, established in the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396a]
§§ 1902(a)(10), 1905(p) and 1933, pay the monthly Medicare Part B premium for enrollees and
provide certain enrollees with help paying for out-of-pocket costs. For individuals who are disabled
and working, the program pays the Part A premium only. The programs are designed to improve
access to necessary medical services and to address financial insecurity of low-income Medicare
enrollees: people age sixty-five (65) years and older and people with severe disabilities. States are
allowed to set income and asset limits for the Medicare savings programs that exceed the federally
mandated minimum levels. The federal government pays all or some of the costs for those enrolled
in the Medicare savings programs. The federally-mandated minimum eligibility is too low to
adequately address the needs of thousands of needy Rhode Islanders age sixty-five (65) years and
older and people with severe disabilities. It is the intent of the general assembly to increase
eligibility for the Medicare savings programs consistent with federal law and so long as federal
cost-sharing is provided.
40-8.16-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Income” means the income of the family unit of an individual as determined by the
income-counting rules used for determining eligibility for federal Supplemental Security Income
benefits under title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396a.
(2) “Medicare Part A” means the program established under Part A of title XVIII of the
Social Security Act.
(3) “Medicare Part B” means the program established under Part B of title XVIII of the
Social Security Act.
(4) “Medicare savings programs” and “Medicare premium payment programs” mean,
collectively, the state-administered programs described in § 40-8.16-4.
(5) “Qualified disabled and working individual” means an individual who is not otherwise
eligible for medical assistance; who is entitled to enroll in hospital insurance benefits under section
1818A of Title VIII of the Social Security Act; whose income does not exceed two hundred percent
(200%) of the federal poverty line applicable to the person’s family size; and whose resources do
not exceed twice the maximum amount that an individual (or a couple, in the case of a married
individual) may have and obtain federal supplemental security income benefits under title XVI of
LC000885 - Page 2 of 5

the Social Security Act.
(6) “Qualified individual” means an individual who is not otherwise enrolled in medical
assistance and who is entitled to hospital insurance benefits under part A of title XVIII of the Social
Security Act whose income is greater than one hundred thirty-eight percent (138%) but less than
or equal to one hundred eighty-six percent (186%) of the federal poverty line applicable to the
person’s family size. Insofar as federal financial participation is available, an individual’s resources
shall not be considered in determining whether an individual is a qualified individual.
(7) “Qualified Medicare beneficiary” means an individual who is entitled to hospital
insurance benefits under part A of title XVIII of the Social Security Act whose income does not
exceed one hundred thirty-eight percent (138%) of the federal poverty line applicable to the
person’s family size. Insofar as federal financial participation is available, an individual’s resources
shall not be considered in determining whether an individual is a qualified Medicare beneficiary.
(8) “Resources” means the resources of the family unit of an individual as determined by
the resource-counting rules used for determining eligibility for federal Supplemental Security
Income benefits under title XVI of the Social Security Act. Insofar as federal financial participation
is available, resources shall not be considered in determining an individual’s status as a qualified
Medicare beneficiary or qualified individual.
(9) “Secretary” means the secretary of the executive office of health and human services.
40-8.16-4. Payments.
(a) The state shall provide for enrollment in Medicare Part B, and shall make payments for
the Medicare Part B premium and any Medicare Part A premium, as well as for other Medicare
cost-sharing including co-insurance and deductibles, for any individual who is a qualified Medicare
beneficiary.
(b)(1) To the extent that federal financial participation is available at a one hundred percent
(100%) federal medical assistance percentage and subject to §§ 1933 and 1902(a)(10)(E)(iv) of the
Social Security Act, the state shall provide for enrollment in Medicare Part B, and shall make
payments for the Medicare Part B premium, for any individual who is a qualified individual.
(2) Premium payments for qualified individuals will be one hundred percent (100%)
federally funded up to the amount of the federal allotment. The secretary of health and human
services shall discontinue enrollment into the program when the Part B premium payments made
pursuant to subsection (b)(1) of this section meet the yearly federal allotment.
(c) The state shall make payment for the Medicare Part A premium for any individual who
is a qualified disabled and working individual.
40-8.16-5. Application process and outreach.
LC000885 - Page 3 of 5

The secretary shall ensure that an individual’s data in an application for the Low-Income
Subsidy (LIS) program that is transmitted by the Social Security Administration to the executive
office of health and human services is used to begin the process of application for said individual’s
eligibility as a qualified Medicare beneficiary or qualified individual. The secretary shall maintain
a simplified application form, consistent with federal law for enrollment into these programs, for
application by individuals whose application is not started by transmission of LIS information from
the Social Security Administration. The secretary shall publicize the availability of the Medicare
savings programs.
40-8.16-6. Federal approval and implementation.
The secretary shall submit any necessary amendments to the Medicaid state plan or the
1115 waiver to implement the provisions of this section.
40-8.16-7. Rules and regulations.
The secretary shall make and promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with state
law, pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 ("administrative procedures") as the secretary deems
necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and to carry out the policy and purposes
thereof, and to ensure conformance to the provisions of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396
et seq., and to any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000885
========
LC000885 - Page 4 of 5